en: Gift message option: Custom message available; Message included (fixed); None; Other
th: ตัวเลือกข้อความของขวัญ: ระบุข้อความที่กำหนดเองได้; รวมข้อความแล้ว (ตายตัว); ไม่มี; อื่นๆ
cs: Možnost přidat dárkovou kartu se vzkazem: Možnost vlastní zprávy; Obsahuje zprávu (pevně danou); Žádná; Ostatní
zh-TW: 送禮訊息選項: 可自訂訊息; 內含訊息 (固定); 無; 其他
ko: 선물 메시지 옵션: 사용자 지정 메시지 가능; 메시지 포함(고정); 없음; 기타
zh-CN: 礼品留言选项: 支持自定义留言; 包含留言（固定）; 无; 其他
nb: Alternativ for meldingsutdeling: Egendefinert melding tilgjengelig; Melding inkludert (fast); Ingen; Annet
hr-HR: Opcija poruke za darivanje: Dostupna prilagođena poruka; Poruka je uključena (fiksna); Nema; Ostalo
nl: Cadeauberichtoptie: Aangepast bericht beschikbaar; Bericht inbegrepen (vast); Geen; Overig
pt-PT: opção de mensagem presente: Mensagem personalizada disponível; Mensagem incluída (fixa); Nenhuma; Outra
fi: Lahjan viestin vaihtoehto: Mukautettu viesti saatavilla; Sisältää viestin (kiinteä); Ei mitään; Muu
pl: opcja wiadomości prezentowej: Możliwość dodania własnej wiadomości; Dołączona wiadomość (gotowa); Brak; Inna
tr: Hediye mesajı seçeneği: Özel mesaj eklenebilir; Mesaj dahil (sabit); Yok; Diğer
fr: Option de message cadeau: Message personnalisé disponible; Message inclus (fixe); Aucun; Autre
el: Επιλογή μηνύματος δώρου: Διαθέσιμο προσαρμοσμένο μήνυμα; Περιλαμβάνεται μήνυμα (σταθερό); Κανένα; Άλλο
bg-BG: Опция за съобщения за подарък: Възможност за персонализирано съобщение; Включено съобщение (фиксирано); Няма; Друго
sk-SK: Možnosť pridať darčekový odkaz: Možnosť vlastnej správy; Súčasťou je správa (pevná); Žiadne; Iné
lt-LT: Dovanos žinutės parinktis: Galima pritaikyta žinutė; Pridėta žinutė (fiksuota); Nėra; Kita
sv: Alternativ för presentmeddelande: Eget meddelande tillgängligt; Meddelande ingår (fast); Ingen; Övrigt
ja: ギフトメッセージオプション: カスタムメッセージ可; メッセージ付き (固定); なし; その他
ru: Опция подарочного сообщения: Доступно персонализированное сообщение; Сообщение включено (фиксированное); Нет; Другое
it: opzione di messaggio ai clienti: Messaggio personalizzato disponibile; Messaggio incluso (fisso); Nessuno; Altro
ro-RO: Opțiunea „Mesaj de cadou”: Mesaj personalizat disponibil; Mesaj inclus (fix); Fără; Altele
hu: Ajándékozói üzenet lehetősége: Egyéni üzenet megadható; Tartalmaz üzenetet (fix); Nincs; Egyéb
pt-BR: Opção de mensagem de presente: Mensagem personalizada disponível; Mensagem incluída (fixa); Nenhuma; Outro
da: Mulighed for gavebesked: Brugerdefineret besked er mulig; Besked inkluderet (fast); Ingen; Andet
sl-SI: Možnost obdarovalnega sporočila: Na voljo sporočilo po meri; Vključeno sporočilo (fiksno); Brez; Drugo
es: Opción de mensaje para regalo: Mensaje personalizado disponible; Mensaje incluido (fijo); Ninguna; Otra
vi: Tùy chọn tin nhắn quà tặng: Có thể tùy chỉnh thông điệp; Có bao gồm thông điệp (cố định); Không có; Khác
de: Option für Geschenknachrichten: Eigene Nachricht möglich; Nachricht enthalten (fest); Keine; Sonstige